Utah statutes.
10-3-1303.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Appointed officer" means any person appointed to any statutory office or position or any other person appointed to any position of employment with a city or with a community development and renewal agency under Title 17C, Limited Purpose Local Government Entities - Community Development and Renewal Agencies Act.  Appointed officers include, but are not limited to, persons serving on special, regular, or full-time committees, agencies, or boards whether or not such persons are compensated for their services.  The use of the word "officer" in this part is not intended to make appointed persons or employees "officers" of the municipality.

(2)  "Assist" means to act, or offer or agree to act, in such a way as to help, represent, aid, advise, furnish information to, or otherwise provide assistance to a person or business entity, believing that such action is of help, aid, advice, or assistance to such person or business entity and with the intent to assist such person or business entity.

(3)  "Business entity" means a sole proprietorship, partnership, association, joint venture, corporation, firm, trust, foundation, or other organization or entity used in carrying on a business.

(4)  "Compensation" means anything of economic value, however designated, which is paid, loaned, granted, given, donated, or transferred to any person or business entity by anyone other than the governmental employer for or in consideration of personal services, materials, property, or any other thing whatsoever.

(5)  "Elected officer" means any person elected or appointed to the office of mayor, commissioner, or council member.

(6)  "Improper disclosure" means disclosure of private, controlled, or protected information to any person who does not have both the right and the need to receive the information.

(7)  "Municipal employee" means a person who is not an elected or appointed officer who is employed on a full or part-time basis by a municipality or by a community development and renewal agency under Title 17C, Limited Purpose Local Government Entities - Community Development and Renewal Agencies Act.

(8)  "Private, controlled, or protected information" means information classified as private,  controlled, or protected under Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act or other applicable provision of law.

(9)  "Substantial interest" means the ownership, either legally or equitably, by an individual, the individual's spouse, or the individual's minor children, of at least 10% of the outstanding shares of a corporation or 10% interest in any other business entity.

